Utah statutes.
73-28-403.   Water and electricity charges.
The board, in consultation with the committee, shall establish prices for the
developed water sold to the districts and electricity sufficient to:
(1)  recover the reimbursable preconstruction costs, construction costs, and
interest on those costs within the time period specified in Section 73-28-402;
(2)  pay for operation and maintenance costs;
(3)  accumulate an adequate reserve for repair and replacement; and
(4)  allocate the proportionate cost of the project facilities required to
deliver the developed water to each district.
